Washington statutes.
RCW 13.36.030

Guardianship petition—Requirements—Contents—Application of Indian child welfare act, federal servicemembers civil relief act, Washington service members' civil relief act.

(1) Any party to a dependency proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW may request a guardianship be established for a dependent child by filing a petition in juvenile court under this chapter. All parties to the dependency and the proposed guardian must receive adequate notice of all proceedings under this chapter. Service of the notice and summons may be made under direction of the court by any person eighteen years of age or older who is not a party to the proceedings or by any law enforcement officer, probation counselor, or department employee. For purposes of this chapter, a dependent child age twelve years or older is a party to the proceedings. A proposed guardian has the right to intervene in proceedings under this chapter.

(2) To be designated as a proposed guardian in a petition under this chapter, a person must be age twenty-one or over and must meet the minimum requirements to care for children as established by the department under RCW 74.15.030, including but not limited to licensed foster parents, relatives, and suitable persons.

(3) Every petition filed in proceedings under this chapter shall contain: (a) A statement alleging whether the child is or may be an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903. If the child is an Indian child as defined under the Indian child welfare act, the provisions of that act shall apply; (b) a statement alleging whether the federal servicemembers civil relief act of 2003, 50 U.S.C. Sec. 501 et seq. applies to the proceeding; and (c) a statement alleging whether the Washington service members' civil relief act, chapter 38.42 RCW, applies to the proceeding.

(4) Every order or decree entered in any proceeding under this chapter shall contain: (a) A finding that the Indian child welfare act does or does not apply. Where there is a finding that the Indian child welfare act does apply, the decree or order must also contain a finding that all notice requirements and evidentiary requirements under the Indian child welfare act have been satisfied; (b) a finding that the federal servicemembers civil relief act of 2003 does or does not apply; and (c) a finding that the Washington service members' civil relief act, chapter 38.42 RCW, does or does not apply.

[ 2019 c 470 s 2; 2010 c 272 s 3.]